Nevada, session 83, SB48.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. NRS 278.0286 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0286 1. Each local planning commission responsible for
the preparation of a city or county master plan and each affected
entity shall prepare and submit to the regional planning commission
and the governing board a complete report by [April] October 1 of
each year indicating any action taken within the previous [calendar]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
fiscal year which furthers or assists in carrying out the policies or
programs contained in the comprehensive regional plan, and any
work relating to the comprehensive regional plan that is proposed
for the next fiscal year.
2. Before submitting a recommendation for proposed
legislation or beginning any program or project relating to the
mandatory provisions of the comprehensive regional plan, a unit of
local government or an affected entity shall file all relevant
information relating to that request, program or project with the
governing board.
Sec. 14. NRS 278.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.040 1. The members of the planning commission are
appointed by the chief executive officer of the city, or in the case of
a county by the chair of the board of county commissioners, with the
approval of the governing body. The members must not be members
of the governing body of the city or county. The majority of the
members of the county planning commission in any county whose
population is 700,000 or more must reside within the unincorporated
area of the county.
2. In Carson City, the members of the planning commission
established as provided in NRS 278.030 are appointed by the Mayor
from the city at large, with the approval of the Board of Supervisors.
3. The governing body may provide for compensation to its
planning commission in an amount of not more than $80 per
meeting of the commission, with a total of not more than $400 per
month, and may provide travel expenses and subsistence allowances
for the members in the same amounts as are allowed for other
officers and employees of the county or city.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the term of
each member is 4 years, or until his or her successor takes office. If
applicable, the term of each member of a county or city planning
commission in any county whose population is 700,000 or more is
coterminous with the term of the member of the governing body
who recommended the appointment to the appointing authority. In a
county whose population is less than 700,000, the governing body
may provide by ordinance that the term of each member of a
county or city planning commission is coterminous with the term
of the member of the governing body who recommended the
appointment to the appointing authority. If the recommending
member resigns his or her office before the expiration of his or her
term, the corresponding member of the planning commission may
continue to serve until the office is next filled by election. If the
office of the recommending member becomes vacant before the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
expiration of the term for any other reason, the corresponding
member of the planning commission may continue to serve for the
duration of the original term.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, members of
a county or city planning commission may be removed, after public
hearing, by a majority vote of the governing body for just cause. In a
county whose population is 700,000 or more, members of a county
or city planning commission serve at the pleasure of their appointing
authority.
6. Vacancies occurring otherwise than through the expiration
of term must be filled for the unexpired term.
Sec. 15. 1. This section and sections 1 to 12, inclusive, of
this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 13 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
3. Section 14 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2029.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)